New York, session 2025-2026, A10377.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 2 of section 1912 of the public authorities law 2 is amended by adding a new paragraph (d) to read as follows: 3 (d) The renewable energy development data resources providing informa- 4 tion pursuant to paragraph (c) of this subdivision shall also include 5 mapping of capital projects receiving over one million dollars of state 6 funding that have been approved or completed within the previous five 7 years of the effective date of this paragraph, for purposes of providing 8 public information related to the viability of siting solar energy 9 arrays, major renewable energy facilities, or major electric trans- 10 mission facilities on or near such capital projects. In developing such 11 map, the authority shall consult with the office of renewable energy 12 siting and empire state development corporation. The authority shall 13 produce such map within one year of the effective date of this paragraph 14 and shall update it no less than annually. 15 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately; provided, however, that 16 the amendments to subdivision 2 of section 1912 of the public authori- 17 ties law made by section one of this act shall not affect the repeal of 18 such section and shall be deemed repealed therewith. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11824-01-5